New Jersey, session 222, A4600.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The reimbursement rate for basic life support emergency ambulance transportation services within the Medicaid program, established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), whether the services are provided in the Medicaid fee-for-service delivery system or through a managed care delivery system, shall be no less than $200 per transport. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.